Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB395.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 199.570 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The files and records of the court during adoption proceedings shall not be
open to inspection by persons other than parties to the proceedings, their
attorneys, and representatives of the cabinet except under order of the court
expressly permitting inspection.
(b) Upon the entry of the final order in the case, the clerk shall place all papers
and records in the case in a suitable envelope which shall be sealed, or a
digital file with restricted access, and shall not be open for inspection by any
person, except as provided in KRS 199.572. Health information received
pursuant to KRS 199.525 shall be added to the adoption case file. The clerk of
the Circuit Court shall set up a separate docket and order book for adoption
cases and these files and records shall be kept locked.
(c) No person having charge of any adoption records shall disclose the names of
any parties appearing in such records or furnish any copy of any such records
to any person or other entity that does not meet the requirements of KRS
199.572, except upon order of the court which entered the judgment of
adoption.
(2) (a) After entry of the adoption judgment, the clerk of the Circuit Court shall
promptly provide[report] to the cabinet all[ for Health and Family Services of
Kentucky full] information[ as called for on forms furnished by the Cabinet
for Health and Family Services,] necessary to make a new birth certificate
that conforms[conforming] to the standard birth certificate form.
(b) Upon receipt of this information, the cabinet[ for Health and Family Services]
shall make[cause to be made] a new record of the birth to[and it shall] be filed
with the original certificate.[, and] The original certificate shall be stamped
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/6/2025 12:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1402
with the words, "CONFIDENTIAL -- subject to copy and/or inspection only
on written order of the court."
(c) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A to create a birth certificate form that complies with the
requirements of subsection (3) of this section.
(3) (a) The new birth certificate shall set forth the new name, if any, of the adopted
child, the names of the adoptive parents, and any[such] other information
deemed necessary in accordance with administrative[ rules] and regulations
promulgated by the cabinet regarding the form and issuance[for Health and
Family Services in issuing] of birth certificates. If the adopted child is under
eighteen (18) years of age, the birth certificate shall not contain any
information revealing the child is adopted and shall show the adoptive parent
or parents as the biological parent or parents of the child, except as provided
in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) In the case of a deceased biological parent or parents, the new birth
certificate shall contain the names of the deceased biological parent or
parents and the adopted parent or parents if requested by the court, the
adoptive parent or parents, or the adopted child.
(c) If requested by the adoptive parents, the new birth certificate when issued
shall contain the location of birth, hospital, and name of doctor or midwife.
This information shall[should] be given only by an order of the court in which
the child was adopted. The new birth certificate shall recite the residence of
the adoptive parents as the birthplace of the child, which[ and this] shall be
deemed for all legal purposes to be the birthplace of the child.
(d) If no birth certificate is on file for a child born in Kentucky, the cabinet[ for
Health and Family Services] shall prepare a certificate of birth in accordance
with the information furnished to the cabinet by the clerk of the Circuit Court
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/6/2025 12:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1402
that[which] issued the adoption order.
(e) The cabinet[ for Health and Family Services] shall furnish to the clerks of the
Circuit Courts the necessary forms to carry out the provisions of this section.
(f) If the child was born in another state, the order of adoption shall be forwarded
to the division of vital statistics of the state concerned to be changed in
accordance with the laws of that[such] state.
(g) If the child was born in a foreign country, the report of adoption shall be
returned to the attorney or agency handling the adoption for submission to the
appropriate federal agency.
(4) [Thereafter ]When any copy of the certificate of birth of any child is issued, it shall
be a copy of the new certificate of birth, except when an order of the court granting
the judgment of adoption authorizes[shall request] the issuance of the copy of the
original certificate of the child's birth.
(5) If any judgment of adoption is reversed, modified, or vacated[ in any particular], the
clerk of the Circuit Court shall notify the cabinet[ for Health and Family Services]
of the reversal or modification and the effect of same, and the cabinet shall make
any necessary changes in its records.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/6/2025 12:27 PM Jacketed